California, session 20252026, AB2524.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:(a) Issuing work permits to minors facing barriers to rehabilitation, stability, independence, or positive youth development will address chronic absenteeism and provide employment opportunities.(b) Allowing a juvenile court county probation department or county child welfare agency to issue work permits to minors who are under the jurisdiction of a juvenile court will ensure that dependent and delinquent youth are fairly provided with access in seeking lawful employment and address issues of chronic absenteeism.SEC. 2. Section 49110 of the Education Code is amended to read:49110. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature that school district, charter school, and private school personnel responsible for issuing work permits to pupils have a working knowledge of California labor laws as they relate to minors and be trained to provide pupils with practical personal guidance in career education.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that work permits are issued, in a timely manner, by a juvenile court county probation department or county child welfare agency to minors who are under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.(c) Any of the following individuals may issue a work permit to a minor subject to the requirements and conditions of this chapter:(1) The superintendent of a school district in which the minor resides.(2) The chief executive officer, or the equivalent position, of a charter school that the minor attends.(3) A person holding a services credential with a specialization in pupil personnel services authorized by the superintendent of the school district or chief executive officer in writing, or a certificated work experience education teacher or coordinator authorized by the superintendent of the school district or chief executive officer in writing.(4) If the minor resides in a portion of a county not under the jurisdiction of the superintendent of a school district and does not attend a charter school, the county superintendent of schools, a person holding a services credential with a specialization in pupil personnel services authorized by the county superintendent of schools in writing, or a certificated work experience education teacher or coordinator authorized by the county superintendent of schools in writing may issue a work permit.(5) (A) If a minor is under the jurisdiction of a juvenile court, a judicial officer designated by the presiding judge of the juvenile court may issue a work permit to any of the following: work permit may be issued pursuant to either or both of the following:(i) A By a county probation department for a minor who is a ward of the court pursuant to Section 601 or 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(ii) A By a county child welfare agency for a minor who is a dependent child of the court pursuant to Section 300 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(iii)A minor placed in suitable out-of-home care under the supervision of a probation department or child welfare services agency.(B) A work permit issued pursuant to this paragraph shall meet all of the following:(i) Be issued only upon a finding that if the employment is in the best interest of the minor.(ii) Be issued on a form that contains all of the information described in Section 49115.(iii) Be recognized by school districts, employers, and state agencies as valid to the same extent as a work permit issued by a school district.(C) This paragraph shall not limit the authority of a school district to issue work permits to minors enrolled in schools maintained by the school district.(D) A judicial officer who county probation department or county child welfare agency that issues a work permit pursuant to this paragraph shall provide written notice, within 60 days of issuing the work permit, to the minor’s school district, charter school, or private school personnel responsible for issuing work permits.(6) Subject to the requirements and conditions in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, the principal of a public or private school may issue, or designate another administrator in the school to issue, work permits to pupils who attend the school. If the principal of a public or private school chooses not to issue work permits pursuant to this paragraph, work permits may be issued to pupils attending that school pursuant to paragraph (1), (3), or (4) or Section 49110.1.(A) A principal who issues a work permit pursuant to this paragraph shall provide a self-certification that the principal understands the requirements in existing law for issuing a work permit. The principal shall submit a copy of each work permit the principal issues along with a copy of the application for each work permit to the superintendent of the school district in which the school is located.(B) The superintendent of a school district may revoke a work permit issued by the principal of a public or private school located within the school district if the superintendent becomes aware of any grounds upon which the pupil may be deemed ineligible for a work permit under existing law.(C) An individual with authority to issue a work permit pursuant to this subdivision shall not issue a work permit to their own child.(d) A school district, charter school, or private school may revoke a work permit issued by a judicial officer county probation department or county child welfare agency pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) in the same manner that revocation of a work permit issued by the school district, charter school, or private school occurs. If a school district, charter school, or private school revokes a work permit issued by a judicial officer county probation department or county child welfare agency pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (c), the school district, charter school, or private school personnel responsible for issuing work permits shall provide written notice to the judicial officer county probation department or county child welfare agency within 60 days of the revocation.(e) A work permit shall not be issued until the written request for the permit from the parent, guardian, foster parent, caregiver with whom the minor resides, educational rights holder or attorney representing a minor described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (c), or residential shelter services provider, has been filed with the issuing authority. “Residential shelter services” refers to residential and other support services provided to minors by a governmental agency, a person or agency under contract with a governmental agency to provide these services, an agency receiving funding from community funds, or a licensed community care facility or crisis resolution center on a temporary or emergency basis in a facility that services only minors.(f) If the certificated person designated to issue work permits by the superintendent of a school district or the chief executive officer, or the equivalent position, of a charter school is not available, and delay in issuing a permit would jeopardize the ability of a pupil to secure work, another person authorized by the superintendent of the school district or the chief executive officer, or the equivalent position, of a charter school may issue the work permit.(g) If a school district or charter school does not employ or contract with a person holding a services credential with a specialization in pupil personnel services or with a certificated work experience education teacher or coordinator, the superintendent of the school district or the chief executive officer, or the equivalent position, of a charter school may authorize, in writing, a person who does not hold that credential to issue work permits during periods of time in which the superintendent is absent from the district or the chief executive officer is absent from the charter school.(h) Notwithstanding the hour limitations imposed by this chapter or any other law, the hour limitations that apply to a work permit issued by any of the individuals described in subdivision (c) shall be based on the school calendar of the school the pupil attends.